Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3962
Board; report; contents.

The board shall prepare a report on or before October 1 of each year setting forth the income received from the assessments collected in accordance with section 2-3958 for the preceding fiscal year, and the report shall include:

(1) The expenditure of funds by the board during the year for the administration of the Dairy Industry Development Act;

(2) A brief description of all contracts requiring the expenditure of funds by the board;

(3) The action taken by the board on all such contracts;

(4) An explanation of all programs relating to the discovery, promotion, and development of markets and industries for the utilization of dairy products and the direct expense associated with each program;

(5) The name and address of each member of the board; and

(6) A brief description of the rules, regulations, and orders adopted and promulgated by the board.

Such report shall be available to the public upon request.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 15.